Missouri, session 2026, SB1156.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 376.389, to read as
follows:
376.389. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Cost-sharing", expenses imposed on an enrollee
for a covered health care service under the enrollee's
health benefit plan including, but not limited to,
deductibles, co-payments, and coinsurance;
(2) "Drug", the same meaning as is ascribed to such
term in section 376.1350;
(3) "Enrollee", the same meaning as is ascribed to
such term in section 376.1350;
(4) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning as is
ascribed to such term in section 376.1350;
(5) "Health care service", the same meaning as is
ascribed to such term in section 376.1350;
(6) "Health carrier", the same meaning as is ascribed
to such term in section 376.1350;

SB 1156 2
(7) "Pharmacy", the same meaning as is ascribed to
such term in section 338.210;
(8) "Prescription insulin drug", a drug that contains
insulin and is used to control blood glucose levels to treat
diabetes, except that such term shall not include an insulin
drug that is administered to a patient intravenously;
(9) "Rebate", any discount, negotiated concession, or
other payment provided by a pharmaceutical manufacturer,
pharmacy, or health benefit plan to an entity to sell,
provide, pay, or reimburse a pharmacy or other entity in the
state for the dispensing or administration of drugs on
behalf of itself or another entity;
(10) "Trade secret", the same meaning as is ascribed
to such term in section 417.453.
2. No health benefit plan that provides coverage for
prescription insulin drugs shall impose cost-sharing on an
enrollee in excess of thirty dollars per thirty-day supply
of a prescription insulin drug.
3. (1) An enrollee's cost-sharing for prescription
insulin drugs shall be calculated at the point of sale based
on a drug price that is reduced by an amount equal to at
least one hundred percent of all rebates received, or to be
received, in connection with the dispensing or
administration of the drug.
(2) Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a co-
payment not calculated based on drug price, provided that
the co-payment does not exceed the reduced price of the drug.
(3) Nothing in this subsection shall preclude a health
carrier from reducing a covered individual's cost-sharing
for a prescription insulin drug by an amount greater than
that required under this subsection.

SB 1156 3
(4) In complying with the provisions of this
subsection, no health carrier or its agents shall be
required to publish or otherwise reveal information
regarding the actual amount of rebates a health carrier
receives on a product, manufacturer, or pharmacy-specific
basis. Such information shall be protected as a trade
secret, shall not be a public record under chapter 610, and
shall not be disclosed directly or indirectly. A health
carrier shall impose the confidentiality protections of this
section on any vendor or other third party that performs
health care or administrative services on behalf of the
health carrier and that may receive or have access to rebate
information.
4. If any provision of this section or the application
thereof to anyone or to any circumstance is held invalid,
the remainder of this section and the application of such
provisions to others or other circumstances shall not be
affected thereby.
5. This section shall apply to health benefit plans
delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed on or
after January 1, 2027.
✓